Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1846.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(a.7)(2)(i) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 303. Classes of Income.--* * *(a.7) The following apply:* * *(2) (i) The following shall not be subject to tax under this article:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (F) Any compensation received by an individual taxpayer under eighteen years of age.* * *Section 2. The addition of section 303(a.7)(2)(i)(F) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1846PN2282 - 2 - 1234567